Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.080

Certification requirements.

The department shall issue a certificate to any applicant who meets the standards established under this chapter and who:

(1) Is holding one of the following:

(a) Certificate of proficiency, registered professional reporter, registered merit reporter, or registered diplomate reporter from [the] national court reporters association;

(b) Certificate of proficiency or certificate of merit from [the] national stenomask verbatim reporters association; or

(c) A current Washington state court reporter certification; or

(2) Has passed an examination approved by the director or an examination that meets or exceeds the standards established by the director.

[ 1995 c 269 s 504; 1995 c 27 s 8; 1989 c 382 s 9.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1995 c 27 s 8 and by 1995 c 269 s 504, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.